Hawaii, session 2026, HB1292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§26- Intergovernmental agreements and partnerships.  (a) A department or agency established under this chapter may enter into: (1)  Intergovernmental agreements with other governmental bodies; or (2)  Partnership agreements with private-sector entities or nonprofit organizations, to achieve statutorily mandated goals. (b)  Each intergovernmental or partnership agreement shall: (1)  Be consistent with the statutory mandates of the department or agency; (2)  Promote public benefits and align with state policy goals; (3)  Ensure transparency, accountability, and compliance with chapter 103D; and (4)  Be reviewed and approved as to form and legality by the attorney general. (c)  Each department or agency shall submit to the legislature a report on the intergovernmental and partnership agreements entered into by the department or agency no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each session.  The report shall detail the scope, purpose, and outcome of each intergovernmental and partnership agreement entered into by the department or agency." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________